Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1325
Arbitration board; final decision; appeal.

The final decision of the arbitration board shall be binding upon the parties. If a party to any arbitration proceeding is not satisfied with the decision entered by the arbitration board, such party may appeal as provided in section 70-1326 to reverse, vacate, or modify the decision, and such decision shall be in abeyance until the appellate court has issued its opinion.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 124.